Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-810
Hearings; conferences; files; confidentiality.

(1) All court hearings or conferences in proceedings under the provisions of the Conciliation Court Law shall be held in private and the court shall exclude all persons except the officers of the court, the parties, their counsel, and witnesses. Conferences may be held with each party and his or her counsel separately and in the discretion of the judge or counselor conducting the conference or hearing, counsel for one party may be excluded when the adverse party is present. All communications, verbal or written, from parties to the judge or counselor in a proceeding under the provisions of such law shall be deemed made to such officer in official confidence.

(2) The files of the conciliation court shall be closed. The petition, supporting affidavit, reconciliation agreement, and any court order made in the matter may be opened to inspection by any party or his or her counsel upon the written authority of the judge of the conciliation court.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 10, p. 657;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 29.